Louisiana, session 2026, HB474.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subparts GGG and HHH of Part I of Chapter 1 of Subtitle II of Title 47
of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 47:120.401 and 120.402, are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART GGG. GRAMBLING UNIVERSITY NATIONAL ALUMNI
ASSOCIATION
§120.401. Income tax checkoff; donation for Grambling University National
Alumni Association
For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, every individual who
files an individual income tax return for the current tax year and who is entitled to
a refund may designate on his current year return that all or any portion of the total
amount of the refund to which he is entitled shall be donated to the Grambling
University National Alumni Association in lieu of that amount being paid to him as
a refund. The refund shall be reduced by the amount so designated. The designation
shall be made at the time of the filing of the current year tax return and shall be made
upon the income tax return form as prescribed by the secretary of the Department of
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 474 ENROLLED
Revenue. Donated monies shall be administered by the secretary and distributed to
the Grambling University National Alumni Association in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 47:120.37. No donation made pursuant to the provisions of this
Subpart shall be invalid for want of an authentic act.
SUBPART HHH. LOUISIANA TECH UNIVERSITY ALUMNI ASSOCIATION
§120.402. Income tax checkoff; donation for Louisiana Tech University Alumni
Association
For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, every individual who
files an individual income tax return for the current tax year and who is entitled to
a refund may designate on his current year return that all or any portion of the total
amount of the refund to which he is entitled shall be donated to the Louisiana Tech
University Alumni Association in lieu of that amount being paid to him as a refund.
The refund shall be reduced by the amount so designated. The designation shall be
made at the time of the filing of the current year tax return and shall be made upon
the income tax return form as prescribed by the secretary of the Department of
Revenue. Donated monies shall be administered by the secretary and distributed to
the Louisiana Tech University Alumni Association in accordance with the provisions
of R.S. 47:120.37. No donation made pursuant to the provisions of this Subpart shall
be invalid for want of an authentic act.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be applicable to taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.